apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="Палі/й__np_cog"><!--TODO: check f.pl-->
  <e>       <p><l>й</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єві</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єм</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їв</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їв</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Волошин__np_cog"><!--TODO: check f.pl-->
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ої</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ій</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>им</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>их</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ими</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Україн/а__np_top">
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l>        <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l>         <r>а<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="США__np_top_m_pl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ЄС__np_top_m_sg">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="УРСР__np_top_f_sg">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ООН__np_org_f_sg">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ЦВК__np_org_m_sg">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Юрі/й__np_ant">
  <e>       <p><l>й</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>я</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єві</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єві</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>єм</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ю</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їв</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>їв</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ям</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ях</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ями</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ї</l><r>й<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Україна">         <i>Україн</i><par n="Україн/а__np_top"/></e>
<e lm="Юрій">            <i>Юрі</i><par n="Юрі/й__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Волошин">         <i>Волошин</i><par n="Волошин__np_cog"/></e>
<e lm="Палій">           <i>Палі</i><par n="Палі/й__np_cog"/></e>
<e lm="США">             <i>США</i><par n="США__np_top_m_pl"/></e>
<e lm="ЄС">              <i>ЄС</i><par n="ЄС__np_top_m_sg"/></e>
<e lm="СРСР">            <i>СРСР</i><par n="ЄС__np_top_m_sg"/></e>
<e lm="УРСР">            <i>УРСР</i><par n="УРСР__np_top_f_sg"/></e>
<e lm="Аризона">         <i>Аризон</i><par n="Україн/а__np_top"/></e>
<e lm="ООН">             <i>ООН</i><par n="ООН__np_org_f_sg"/></e>
<e lm="КПУ">             <i>КПУ</i><par n="ООН__np_org_f_sg"/></e>
<e lm="ЦВК">             <i>ЦВК</i><par n="ЦВК__np_org_m_sg"/></e>
